North Carolina, session 2025, SB1072.
General Assembly of North Carolina enacts:
SECTION 1.(a) Article I of the North Carolina Constitution reads as rewritten:
"ARTICLE I
"DECLARATION OF RIGHTS

"That the great, general, and essential principles of liberty and free government may be
recognized and established, and that the relations of this State to the Union and government of
the United States and those of the people of this State to the rest of the American people may be
defined and affirmed, we do declare that:
…
Section 39. Right to possession of limited amounts of cannabis for personal use.
The possession of limited amounts of cannabis for personal use shall not be a criminal offense
in this State. The General Assembly shall enact general laws governing the possession of limited
amounts of cannabis for personal use consistent with this section."
SECTION 1.(b) The amendment set out in Section 1(a) of this act shall be submitted
to the qualified voters of the State at the statewide general election to be held on November 3,
2026, which election shall be conducted in accordance with the laws governing elections at that
time. The question to be used in the voting systems and ballots shall be:
"[ ] FOR [ ] AGAINST
Constitutional amendment allowing the possession of limited amounts of cannabis for
personal use subject to certain conditions enacted by the General Assembly."
SECTION 1.(c) The State Board of Elections shall certify the results of the
referendum conducted under Section 1(b) of this act. If a majority of votes cast on the question
are in favor of the amendment set out in Section 1(a) of this act, the Secretary of State shall enroll
the amendment among the permanent records of that office. If a majority of votes cast on the
question are against the amendment set out in Section 1(a) of this act, the amendment shall have
no effect.
SECTION 1.(d) If the certification from the State Board of Elections under Section
1(c) of this act reflects that a majority of votes cast on the question are in favor of the amendment
set out in Section 1(a) of this act, the amendment set out in Section 1(a) of this act is effective
upon certification.
SECTION 2.(a) Article I of the North Carolina Constitution reads as rewritten:
"ARTICLE I
*S1072-v-1*

General Assembly Of North Carolina Session 2025
"DECLARATION OF RIGHTS

"That the great, general, and essential principles of liberty and free government may be
recognized and established, and that the relations of this State to the Union and government of
the United States and those of the people of this State to the rest of the American people may be
defined and affirmed, we do declare that:
…
Section 39. Right to medical use of cannabis.
The possession of limited amounts of cannabis for medical use by patients with qualifying
conditions shall not be a criminal offense in this State. The General Assembly shall enact general
laws governing the possession of cannabis for medical use consistent with this section."
SECTION 2.(b) The amendment set out in Section 2(a) of this act shall be submitted
to the qualified voters of the State at the statewide general election to be held on November 3,
2026, which election shall be conducted in accordance with the laws governing elections at that
time. The question to be used in the voting systems and ballots shall be:
"[ ] FOR [ ] AGAINST
Constitutional amendment allowing the possession of cannabis for medical use by
patients with qualifying conditions subject to certain conditions enacted by the General
Assembly."
SECTION 2.(c) The State Board of Elections shall certify the results of the
referendum conducted under Section 2(b) of this act. If a majority of votes cast on the question
are in favor of the amendment set out in Section 2(a) of this act, the Secretary of State shall enroll
the amendment among the permanent records of that office. If a majority of votes cast on the
question are against the amendment set out in Section 2(a) of this act, the amendment shall have
no effect.
SECTION 2.(d) If the certification from the State Board of Elections under Section
2(c) of this act reflects that a majority of votes cast on the question are in favor of the amendment
set out in Section 2(a) of this act, the amendment set out in Section 2(a) of this act is effective
upon certification.
SECTION 3. Except as otherwise provided, the remainder of this act is effective
when it becomes law.
Page 2 Senate Bill 1072-First Edition